Massachusetts, session 194th, S161.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 23C the following section:-
Section 23D. (a) The department shall, subject to appropriation, provide a cash stipend of
$1,000 per month for 5 years to any individual who was formerly under the custody, care or
responsibility of the department but has transitioned from the custody, care or responsibility of
the department any time between the ages of 18 and 23. Should such an individual at any time
return to the custody, care, or responsibility of the department, that individual’s monthly stipend
will be put on hold until such time as the individual again transitions from the custody, care or
responsibility of the department; provided, however, that no individual is eligible for more than
60 total monthly payments of this stipend during the individual’s lifetime.
of 2

(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, this stipend shall not be
considered income for purposes of determining eligibility for any other benefit provided by the
Commonwealth.
(c) The department shall inform all eligible foster care youth, in person and by writing,
and their counsel as appointed under section 29 of chapter 119, of the availability of this cash
stipend within 30 days of the youth attaining the age of 17 years and 6 months. The department
shall provide appropriate case management to support eligible youth within the department’s
custody, care, or responsibility in applying for this cash stipend and other support needed to
assist the youth in making the transition from foster care to a successful adulthood, including
setting up a personal bank account where this cash stipend may be deposited, making the youth
aware of other state benefits for which the youth may be eligible, and connecting youth to
financial literacy education or training.
(d) The department shall not terminate or suspend the payment of this cash stipend for
any reason other than the return of the individual to the custody, care, or responsibility of the
department.
(e) The department shall take steps to notify eligible former foster care youth of the
existence and availability of this cash stipend and shall publish data as to the number of eligible
young adults receiving this cash stipend.
of 2